Utah statutes.
62A-11-510.   Violations by payor.

(1)  A payor may not discharge, refuse to hire, or discipline any obligor because of a notice to withhold under this part.

(2)  If a payor violates Subsection (1), the payor is liable to the obligor as provided in Section 62A-11-316 and the obligee for the greater of $1,000 or the amount of child support accumulated to the date of discharge which should have been withheld plus interest on that amount and costs incurred in collecting the amount, including reasonable attorneys' fees.



Enacted by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

